Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.210

Effective date and time.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter and subject to RCW 23.95.220(4), an entity filing is effective:

(1) On the date of filing and at the time specified in the entity filing as its effective time;

(2) Unless prohibited by the entity's organic law, at a specified delayed effective date and time, which may not be more than ninety days after the date of filing;

(3) If a delayed effective date is specified, but no time is specified, at 12:01 a.m. on the date specified; or

(4) If subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section does not apply, on the date and at the time of its filing by the secretary of state as provided in RCW 23.95.225.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1203.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.